Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1 General Provisions
4-51-111. Lottery proceeds.

All lottery proceeds shall be the property of the corporation.

From its lottery proceeds the corporation shall pay the operating expenses of the corporation. As nearly as practical, at least fifty percent (50%) of the amount of money from the actual sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be made available as prize money; provided that this subdivision (a)(2) shall not be deemed to create any lien, entitlement, cause of action, or other private right, and any rights of holders of tickets or shares shall be determined by the corporation in setting the terms of its lottery or lotteries.

As nearly as practical, for each fiscal year, net lottery proceeds shall equal at least thirty-five percent (35%) of the lottery proceeds or an amount that maximizes net lottery proceeds; provided, however, that for the first two (2) full fiscal years and any partial first fiscal year of the corporation, net lottery proceeds need only equal, as nearly as practical, thirty percent (30%) of the lottery proceeds. If, after the second full fiscal year, the corporation determines that an amount that maximizes net lottery proceeds is less than thirty-five percent (35%) of the lottery proceeds, then, immediately upon making such determination, the corporation shall file with the state funding board a statement of reasons supporting such determination and a projection of such amount.

There is created within the state treasury a “lottery for education account.” Amounts remaining in the account at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. Money in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6 for the sole benefit of the account. All earnings attributable to such investments shall be credited to the lottery for education account.

On or before the fifteenth day of the first month of each quarter, the corporation shall transfer to the state treasury, for credit to the lottery for education account, an amount representing an estimate of the net lottery proceeds for the immediately preceding quarter. Any additional transfers required to reconcile the amount of the net lottery proceeds transferred on the fifteenth day of the month shall be completed by the last business day of the month following the end of the quarter. Upon deposit into the state treasury, net lottery proceeds shall become the unencumbered property of the state of Tennessee and the corporation shall have no power to agree or undertake otherwise. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(3), such funds shall be expended for education programs and purposes in accordance with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5.

A general shortfall reserve subaccount shall be maintained within the lottery for education account.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(D), the amount of the general shortfall reserve subaccount shall equal one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In any fiscal year, only an amount necessary to maintain the general shortfall reserve subaccount in an amount equal to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be deposited into the subaccount.

If the net lottery proceeds deposited into the lottery for education account in any year, exclusive of the amount in the general shortfall reserve subaccount, are not sufficient to meet the amount appropriated for educational programs and purposes pursuant to subsection (c), the general shortfall reserve subaccount may be drawn upon to meet the deficiency; provided, however, that reserves in the account shall be used first for any shortfall in the amount appropriated to the educational scholarship program and then to any other educational programs and purposes otherwise provided by law for which net lottery proceeds may be expended. In the event it becomes necessary to draw from the general shortfall reserve subaccount in any fiscal year for educational programs and purposes, such programs and purposes shall be reviewed and shall be reduced to the amount of available net lottery proceeds, exclusive of the general shortfall reserve subaccount, estimated to be available in the next fiscal year. In the event the general shortfall reserve subaccount is drawn upon in any fiscal year, the subaccount shall be brought back to its prior level in subsequent fiscal years. Five percent (5%) of net lottery proceeds shall be deposited into the lottery for education account each quarter, until the amount of the general shortfall reserve subaccount equals one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). Notwithstanding this subdivision (b)(3)(C) to the contrary, the program reduction and repayment provisions of this subdivision (b)(3)(C) shall not be triggered, if amounts in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) are recommended for appropriation pursuant to subdivision (b)(3)(D).

In addition to the amount provided pursuant to subdivision (b)(3)(B), the funding board may recommend appropriation of funds to the general shortfall reserve subaccount if such fund is deemed inadequate. The funding board may recommend appropriation of funds from the general shortfall reserve subaccount if adequate funds are deemed to be available in the general shortfall reserve subaccount and if such funds are needed for educational programs and purposes consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5; provided, that “adequate funds” shall not be deemed to be available if such recommended appropriation would reduce the general shortfall reserve account below one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

The comptroller of the treasury shall annually review and report to the education committee of the senate and the education committee of the house of representatives concerning the adequacy of the balance of the general shortfall reserve subaccount, whether payment from net lottery proceeds for educational programs authorized in the Constitution of Tennessee has been sufficient to fund the programs without drawing on the general shortfall reserve subaccount and whether triggers for replenishing or increasing the general shortfall reserve subaccount, if deemed inadequate, are sufficient.

A special reserve subaccount shall be maintained within the lottery for education account. The amount of the special reserve subaccount shall be equal to one percent (1%) of net lottery proceeds deposited into the lottery for education account from all deposits made to the fund from the initial deposit until the last deposit made in fiscal year 2007-2008. Transfers to the special reserve subaccount shall be made from the lottery for education account quarterly until the end of such fiscal year. The amount in the special reserve subaccount may be used to make or support loans to local government units for educational programs and purposes in accordance with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5 and to pay or secure debt issued for such programs and purposes as otherwise provided by law. Such amount shall supplement, not supplant, nonlottery educational resources for such programs and purposes. Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, treasurer's earnings on the special reserve subaccount shall be credited to the special reserve subaccount to be used in a manner consistent with this subdivision (b)(4).

No later than the date in 2003 upon which the state funding board presents state revenue estimates to the governor pursuant to § 9-4-5202(e)(3), the funding board shall establish a projected revenue range for net lottery proceeds for the remainder of the current fiscal year and the next succeeding fiscal year. No later than the date of presentation of such estimates to the governor by the state funding board in all subsequent years, the funding board shall project the revenue for net lottery proceeds for the remainder of the then current fiscal year and the next succeeding four (4) fiscal years. Such projection shall be made in the same manner as other state revenues are projected by the funding board, which figure may be adjusted prior to the enactment of the general appropriations act. In making such projections, the funding board shall recognize unusual fluctuations in lottery proceeds. In making such projections, the funding board is authorized to obtain information from those having expertise and experience in projecting revenue from the sale of lottery tickets or shares.

Before December 15, 2003, and before December 15 in each succeeding year, the Tennessee student assistance corporation shall prepare a report setting forth an estimate of the total cost of lottery related financial assistance to be provided to Tennessee citizens during the next fiscal year pursuant to title 49, chapter 4, part 9. Such report shall include the major assumptions and the methodology used in arriving at such estimate. For the report due in December 2003, the Tennessee student assistance corporation shall base its estimate of total costs on the award values established pursuant to title 49, chapter 4, part 9. For subsequent reports, the Tennessee student assistance corporation shall base its estimate of total costs on the award values in effect at the time the report is prepared. The Tennessee higher education commission, the board of trustees of the University of Tennessee system, the state board of regents, the department of education and the Tennessee independent college and universities association shall provide the Tennessee student assistance corporation with such information as is needed to prepare its report. The Tennessee student assistance corporation shall deliver its report to the governor, the funding board, the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairs of the senate and house of representatives finance, ways and means committees, the chair of the education committee of the senate, the chair of the education committee of the house of representatives, the state and local government committee of the senate, the state government committee of the house of representatives, and the office of legislative budget analysis.

Before December 15 of each year, the state funding board, with the assistance of the Tennessee student assistance corporation, shall project long-term funding needs of the lottery scholarship and grant programs established under title 49, chapter 4, part 9. The projections shall cover at least the four (4) fiscal years next succeeding the current fiscal year. The analysis shall be performed to determine if adjustments in lottery scholarship and grant programs should be made to prevent funding required in the future for such programs from exceeding estimates of net lottery proceeds made under subdivision (c)(1).

Before December 15, 2003, and before December 15 in each succeeding year, appropriate state agencies shall submit to the funding board and to the governor their recommendations for other educational programs and purposes consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5 based on the difference between the funding board's projections and recommendations for the lottery scholarship program based on the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (c)(2)(A). In no event shall such recommendations exceed the projections of the funding board for a specific fiscal year.

The governor shall submit to the general assembly in the annual budget document prepared pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 51 recommendations concerning the distributions to be made from the lottery for education account based on the projections of the funding board, including recommended appropriations by the funding board from the general shortfall reserve subaccount, if any, and any treasurer's earnings credited to the lottery for education account.

In a separate budget category entitled “net education lottery proceeds,” the governor shall estimate the amount of net lottery proceeds and treasurer's earnings thereon to be credited to the lottery for education account during the fiscal year and the amount of unappropriated surplus estimated to be accrued in the account at the beginning of the fiscal year. The sum of estimated net lottery proceeds, treasurer's earnings thereon, and unappropriated surplus shall be designated “net education lottery proceeds.”

In the budget document, the governor shall submit specific recommendations as to the educational programs and purposes for which appropriations should be made from the lottery for education account. Such recommendation shall include the specific value of each category of awards to be offered pursuant to title 49, chapter 4, part 9. The recommendation for each category of award shall be the value of such award as set in the previous general appropriations act unless such value, based on the estimates of the Tennessee student assistance corporation and the funding board, should be adjusted in a manner consistent with title 49, chapter 4, part 9 and this chapter.

The governor's recommendations as to the educational programs and purposes for which appropriations should be made in accordance with this subdivision (c)(3) shall be referred to the education committee of the senate and the education committee of the house of representatives for recommendation and comments prior to final action by the finance, ways and means committees of both houses on the general appropriations act.

The general assembly shall appropriate from the lottery for education account by specific reference to it, or by reference to “net education lottery proceeds.” All appropriations to any particular budget unit shall be made together in a separate part entitled, identified, administered, and accounted for separately as a distinct budget unit for net education lottery proceeds. Such appropriations shall otherwise be made in the manner required by law for appropriations.

It is the intent of the general assembly that appropriations from the lottery for education account shall be allocated and expended for educational programs and purposes only in accordance with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5. Such net education lottery proceeds shall be used to supplement, not supplant, existing resources for educational programs and purposes.

Any funds appropriated, but not expended, for educational programs or purposes from the lottery for education account or from the general shortfall reserve subaccount shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year but shall be credited, respectively, to the lottery for education account or the general shortfall reserve subaccount and retained there until allocated and appropriated as provided in subdivision (b)(3) and subsection (c).

In compliance with the requirement of this chapter that there shall be a separate accounting of net education lottery proceeds, no deficiency in the lottery for education account shall be replenished by book entries reducing any nonlottery reserve of general funds, including specifically, but without limitation, the reserve for revenue fluctuations or other reserve accounts established by law; nor shall any program or project started specifically from net education lottery proceeds be continued from the general fund; such programs must be adjusted or discontinued according to available net education lottery proceeds unless the general assembly by general law establishes eligibility requirements and appropriates specific other funds within the general appropriations act; nor shall any nonlottery surplus in the general fund be reduced. No surplus in the lottery for education account shall be reduced to correct any nonlottery deficiencies in sums available for general appropriations, and no surplus in the lottery for education account shall be included in any revenue or surplus calculated for setting aside any additional funds in the reserve for revenue fluctuations as provided in § 9-4-211.

There is created a special account in the state treasury to be known as the “after school programs special account,” hereinafter referred to as the “after school account.” In accordance with § 4-51-123, one hundred percent (100%) of moneys constituting an unclaimed prize shall be deposited in the after school account at the end of each fiscal year.

In any fiscal year in which the financial assistance program for attendance at post-secondary educational institutions located within this state is funded pursuant to title 49, chapter 4, part 9, and excess is available from net lottery proceeds for other educational purposes and projects consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5, then in any such fiscal year moneys in the after school account may be appropriated by the general assembly from such account pursuant to subdivision (f)(3).

Moneys in the after school account shall be used exclusively for after school programs consistent with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5. Such moneys shall supplement, not supplant, nonlottery educational resources for after school educational programs and purposes. The general assembly shall appropriate from the after school programs special account by specific reference to it, or by reference to the “after school account.” Such appropriations shall otherwise be made in the manner required by law for appropriations.

Any reserve balance remaining unexpended at the end of a fiscal year in the after school account shall not revert to the general fund but shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, interest accruing on investments and deposits of the after school account shall be credited to such account, shall not revert to the general fund, and shall be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year.

Moneys in the after school account shall be invested by the state treasurer in accordance with § 9-4-603.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2004, ch. 625, § 1; 2004, ch. 841, § 2; 2005, ch. 417, §§ 3-5; 2006, ch. 940, § 1; 2009, ch. 531, §§ 60, 61; 2010, ch. 1030, § 7; 2011, ch. 410, § 9(b); 2012, ch. 896, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 925, § 14; 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2015, ch. 182, §§ 2-4; 2019, ch. 345, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Attorney General Opinions. Use of lottery proceeds for test preparation computer modules is not authorized, OAG 06-111, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 120 (7/13/06).

Tennessee education lottery corporation: contract amendments. OAG 10-73, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (5/21/10).

4-51-112. Minority-owned businesses — Advisory council.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the corporation encourage participation by minority-owned businesses. Accordingly, the board of directors shall adopt a plan that achieves to the greatest extent possible a level of participation by minority-owned businesses taking into account the total number of all retailers and vendors, including any subcontractors. The corporation is authorized and directed to undertake training programs and other educational activities to enable such minority-owned businesses to compete for contracts on an equal basis. The corporation will strive to maximize participation of minority-owned businesses to achieve a minimum participation goal of fifteen percent (15%) through both prime and second tier business contracting opportunities. The board shall monitor the results of minority-owned business participation and shall report the results of minority-owned business participation to the general assembly at least on an annual basis.

The chair of the board, in consultation with the board of directors, shall appoint an advisory council on minority business participation. The council shall be composed of nine (9) citizens, three (3) of whom shall be appointed from and represent each grand division of the state. The membership of the council shall collectively reflect a richness of diversity in professional and business experience, educational attainment, ethnicity, race, gender, heritage, and socio-economic perspective.

The advisory council on minority business participation shall serve as an educational, research and technical resource for the board of directors. It shall be a duty of the council to solicit, analyze and present the views and concerns of minority business owners throughout the state. The council may report to the board of directors or to the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives in writing at any time. The board of directors may invite the council to present oral testimony to the board of directors at any meeting of the board.

The advisory council on minority business participation shall annually elect from its membership a chair, a vice chair and such other officers as it deems necessary. The council shall meet at least quarterly at the call of the chair. The organizational meeting of the advisory board shall be convened by the chair of the board of directors.

Members appointed to the advisory council shall each serve regular terms of three (3) years; provided, however, that in order to stagger such terms, three (3) of the initial appointees shall serve terms of two (2) years, and three (3) of the initial appointees shall serve terms of one (1) year.

The advisory council on minority business participation shall establish its own rules and internal operating procedures. As an operating expense of the corporation, members of the advisory council shall receive a per diem not to exceed the per diem provided to members of the general assembly pursuant to § 3-1-106, for each day's service spent in the performance of the duties and responsibilities of the advisory council.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2012, ch. 925, § 15; 2013, ch. 236, § 65.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch.1, part 2.

4-51-113. Vendors — Requirements when submitting a bid, proposal, or offer — Procurement contract.

The corporation shall investigate the financial responsibility, security, and integrity of any lottery system vendor who is a finalist in submitting a bid, proposal, or offer as part of a major procurement. At the time of submitting such bid, proposal, or offer to the corporation, the corporation shall require the following items:

A disclosure of the vendor's name and address and, as applicable, the names and addresses of the following:

If the vendor is a corporation, the officers, directors, and each stockholder in such corporation; provided, however, that in the case of owners of equity securities of a publicly traded corporation, only the names and addresses of those known to the corporation to own beneficially one percent (1%) or more of such securities need be disclosed;

If the vendor is a trust, the trustee and all persons entitled to receive income or benefits from the trust;

If the vendor is an association, the members, officers, and directors; and

If the vendor is a partnership or joint venture, all of the general partners, limited partners, or joint venturers;

A disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in which the vendor does business and the nature of the business in each such state or jurisdiction;

A disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in which the vendor has contracts to supply gaming goods or services, including, but not limited to, lottery goods and services, and the nature of the goods or services involved for each such state or jurisdiction;

A disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in which the vendor has applied for, has sought renewal of, has received, has been denied, has pending, or has had revoked a lottery or gaming license of any kind or had fines or penalties assessed to the vendor's license, contract, or operation and the disposition of such in each such state or jurisdiction. If any lottery or gaming license or contract has been revoked or has not been renewed or any lottery or gaming license or application has been either denied or is pending and has remained pending for more than six (6) months, all of the facts and circumstances underlying the failure to receive such a license shall be disclosed;

A disclosure of the details of any finding or plea, conviction, or adjudication of guilt in a state or federal court, or in another jurisdiction, of the vendor for any felony or any other criminal offense other than a traffic violation;

A disclosure of the details of any finding or plea, conviction, or adjudication of guilt in a state or federal court, or in another jurisdiction, of any present employee, or past employee within ten (10) years, of the vendor for any felony or misdemeanor involving gambling, theft, computer offenses, forgery, perjury, dishonesty or unlawfully selling or providing a product or substance to a minor;

A disclosure of the details of any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, or corporate or individual purchase or takeover of another corporation, including bonded indebtedness, or any pending litigation of the vendor;

A disclosure of the vendor's minority-owned business participation plan, if a portion of the vendor's contract is to be subcontracted pursuant to the proposal or, if at any time thereafter, a portion of such vendor's contract is subcontracted; and

Such additional disclosures and information as the corporation may determine to be appropriate for the procurement involved.

If ten percent (10%) or more of the cost of a vendor's contract is subcontracted, the vendor shall disclose all of the information required by this section for the subcontractor as if the subcontractor were itself a vendor.

A lottery procurement contract shall not be entered into with any lottery system vendor who has not complied with the disclosure requirements described in subsections (a) and (b) and any contract with such a vendor is voidable at the option of the corporation. Any contract with a vendor who does not comply with such requirements for periodically updating such disclosures during the tenure of a contract as may be specified in such contract may be terminated by the corporation. This section shall be construed broadly and liberally to achieve the ends of full disclosure of all information necessary to allow for a full and complete evaluation by the corporation of the competence, integrity, background, and character of vendors for major procurements.

A major procurement contract shall not be entered into with any vendor who has been found guilty of a felony related to the security or integrity of a lottery in this or any other jurisdiction.

A major procurement contract shall not be entered into with any vendor if such vendor has an ownership interest in an entity that had supplied consultation services under contract to the corporation regarding the request for proposals pertaining to those particular goods or services.

For the purposes of this chapter, “jurisdiction” includes, but is not limited to:

Any Native American tribal government;

Any governmental body at the national, state or local level in the United States or its territories and possessions; and

Any governmental body at the national or state, or its equivalent, level in any other country.

No lottery system vendor nor any applicant for a major procurement contract, or an officer, director or employee of such vendor or applicant, or a member of such officer's, director's or employee's immediate family residing in the same household, shall pay, give, or make any economic opportunity, gift, loan, gratuity, special discount, favor, hospitality, or service, excluding food and beverages having an aggregate value not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) in any calendar year, to any director, the chief executive officer or any employee of the corporation, or to a member of the immediate family of any such person.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, no applicant for a major procurement contract, or any person employed by such applicant, may contact or otherwise solicit a member of the board of directors individually during the application and selection process for such contract. All contact and other solicitations made by an applicant for a major procurement contract, or any person employed by such applicant, shall be directed to the board as a whole.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2004, ch. 841, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §4-51-113(g) would not apply in the situation where an employee of the TEL is married to an employee of one of the TEL's major procurement vendors, OAG 05-113, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 115 (7/19/05).

4-51-114. Vendor — Performance bond or letter of credit — Minority-owned business waiver.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2), each vendor shall, at the execution of the contract with the corporation, post a performance bond or letter of credit from a bank or credit provider acceptable to the corporation in an amount as deemed necessary by the corporation for that particular bid or contract. In lieu of the bond, a vendor may, to assure the faithful performance of its obligations, deposit and maintain with the corporation securities that are interest bearing or accruing and that are rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest classifications by an established nationally recognized investment rating service. Securities eligible under this section are limited to:

Certificates of deposit issued by solvent banks or savings associations approved by the corporation and that are organized and existing under the laws of this state or under the laws of the United States;

United States bonds, notes, and bills for which the full faith and credit of the government of the United States is pledged for the payment of principal and interest; and

Corporate bonds approved by the corporation. The corporation that issued the bonds shall not be an affiliate or subsidiary of the depositor.

Such securities shall be held in trust and shall have at all times a market value at least equal to the full amount estimated to be paid annually to the lottery vendor under contract.

Because of certain economic considerations, minority businesses may not be financially able to comply with the bonding, deposit of securities, or letter of credit requirements of subdivision (a)(1). In order to assure minority participation in major procurement contracts to the most feasible and practicable extent possible, the chief executive officer is authorized and directed to waive the bonding, deposit of securities, and letter of credit requirements of subdivision (a)(1) for a period of five (5) years from the time that a minority business enters into a major procurement contract in cases where any minority business substantiates financial hardship pursuant to the policies and procedures established by the board.

Each vendor shall be qualified to do business in this state and shall file appropriate tax returns as provided by the laws of this state. All contracts under this section shall be governed by the laws of the state.

No contract shall be secured with any vendor in which a public officer, as covered in § 8-50-501(a), or an employee of such officer, has an ownership interest of one percent (1%) or more.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-115. Lottery retailers.

The general assembly recognizes that to conduct a successful lottery, the corporation must develop and maintain a state-wide network of lottery retailers that will serve the public convenience and promote the sale of tickets or shares and the playing of lottery games while ensuring the integrity of the lottery operations, games, and activities.

The corporation shall make every effort to provide small retailers a chance to participate in the sales of lottery tickets or shares.

The corporation shall provide for compensation to lottery retailers in the form of commissions for the sale and cashing of lottery tickets or shares in an amount of not less than six and one-half percent (6 ½%) of gross sales. Each lottery retailer shall be required to cash lottery tickets or shares up to the amount authorized pursuant to § 4-51-108(a)(6) in the manner adopted by regulation, policy, or procedure of the board.

In addition to the commissions for services rendered by lottery retailers pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), the corporation may provide for other forms of compensation for services rendered by lottery retailers relating to the sale of lottery tickets or shares.

The corporation shall issue a certificate of authority to each person with whom it contracts as a retailer for purposes of display; provided, however, that if a retailer contract permits sales at multiple locations, a separate certificate shall be issued for each authorized location. Every lottery retailer shall post and keep conspicuously displayed in a location on the premises where lottery tickets or shares are sold, and accessible to the public, its certificate of authority. No certificate shall be assignable or transferable.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no business seeking to become a lottery retailer shall be prohibited from applying to the corporation, and if successful in such application, from selling lottery tickets or shares, including, but not limited to, businesses licensed pursuant to title 57, chapter 3, part 2; provided, however, that the corporation shall not issue, sell or authorize the sale of lottery tickets at any location licensed to provide deferred presentment services pursuant to title 45, chapter 17, or to any pawnshop, as defined in § 45-6-203, or to any business engaged exclusively in the business of selling lottery tickets or shares; provided, further, that this subsection (e) shall not preclude the corporation from selling or giving away lottery tickets or shares.

The board shall develop a list of objective criteria upon which the qualification of lottery retailers shall be based. Separate criteria shall be developed to govern the selection of retailers of instant tickets and on-line retailers. In developing these criteria, the board shall consider such factors as the applicant's financial responsibility, security of the applicant's place of business or activity, accessibility to the public, integrity, and reputation. The board shall not consider political affiliation, activities, or monetary contributions to political organizations or candidates for any public office. The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The applicant shall be current in filing all applicable tax returns to the state of Tennessee and in payment of all taxes, interest, and penalties owed to the state, excluding items under formal appeal pursuant to applicable statutes. The department of revenue is authorized and directed to provide this information to the corporation upon request; and

No person, partnership, unincorporated association, corporation, including the board and executive officers of the corporation, or other business entity shall be selected as a lottery retailer who:

Has been convicted of a criminal offense related to the security or integrity of a lottery in this state or any other jurisdiction;

Has been convicted of any criminal offense involving gambling, theft, computer offenses, forgery, perjury or dishonesty, unless the person's civil rights have been restored or at least five (5) years have elapsed from the date of the completion of the sentence without a subsequent conviction of a crime described in this subdivision (f)(2)(B);

Has been found to have violated this chapter or any regulation, policy, or procedure of the corporation unless either ten (10) years have passed since the violation or the board finds the violation both minor and unintentional in nature;

Is a vendor or any employee or agent of any vendor doing business with the corporation;

Resides in the same household as a director or an officer of the corporation;

Has made a statement of material fact to the corporation knowing such statement to be false; or

Has been convicted of any criminal offense involving the unlawful selling or providing a product or substance to a minor in this state or any other jurisdiction, unless the offense involves a license violation where any sentence has been completed and the license has been restored, unless the person's civil rights have been restored, or unless at least five (5) years have elapsed from the date of the completion of the sentence without a subsequent conviction of a crime described in this subdivision (f)(2)(G).

Persons applying to become lottery retailers shall be charged a uniform application fee for each lottery outlet. Retailers who participate in on-line games shall be charged a uniform application fee for each on-line outlet.

Any lottery retailer contract executed pursuant to this section may, for good cause, be suspended, revoked, or terminated by the chief executive officer, or such officer's designee, if the retailer is found to have violated any provision of this chapter or objective criteria established by the board. Review of such activities shall be in accordance with the procedures outlined in this chapter and shall not be subject to the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

All lottery retailer contracts shall be renewable unless, in the discretion of the corporation, sooner cancelled or terminated. At the time of renewal, the corporation shall review the lottery retailer's compliance with this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 6. The corporation shall renew such contracts only if the lottery retailer is in compliance with this chapter and title 39, chapter 17, part 6 and would otherwise be eligible to be a lottery retailer pursuant to this chapter and the terms of the retailer's contract; provided, however, that a violation of title 39, chapter 17, part 6 by an employee of a lottery retailer shall only prohibit the issuance of a certificate of authority for the specific location of such violation for a period of one (1) year from the date of conviction unless, in the case of a lottery retailer operating multiple locations and in the discretion of the corporation, the entire contract should be cancelled or terminated as otherwise provided by this chapter or by the retailer's contract.

No lottery retailer or applicant to be a lottery retailer shall pay, give, or make any economic opportunity, gift, loan, gratuity, special discount, favor, hospitality, or service, excluding food and beverages having an aggregate value not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) in any calendar year, to any director, the chief executive officer, or any employee of the corporation, or to a member of the immediate family of any such person.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2; 2004, ch. 841, §§ 1, 3; 2005, ch. 417, § 6; 2007, ch. 319, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 841, § 8 provided that the amendment of (f)(2)(B) by that act shall only apply to lottery retailer applications submitted, and lottery retailer contracts entered into on or after June 8, 2004.